Hawaii, session 2026, HB2593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Extend for a period of ten years the master lease of Mauna Kea lands that is currently set to expire on December 31, 2033; and (2)  Require that all subleases of Mauna Kea lands to astronomical observatories be extended for a period of ten years. SECTION 2. (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary: (1)  The lease between the board of land and natural resources and the university of Hawaii that was entered into on June 21, 1968, as General Lease S‑4191, as amended on September 21, 1999, as General Lease S-5529, and that is transferred to the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight authority pursuant to part II of Act 255, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022; and (2)  Any other lease or easement between the board of land and natural resources and the university of Hawaii pertaining to Mauna Kea lands that is currently in effect, expires on December 31, 2033, and is transferred to the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight authority pursuant to part II of Act 255, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, shall be extended, by operation of law, for a period of ten years, to expire on December 31, 2043; provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to amend, or authorize the amendment of, any other term or provision within the respective lease or easement except for the date upon which the lease or easement expires; provided further that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the transfer of powers, functions, and duties from the university of Hawaii to the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight authority pursuant to part II of Act 255, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, or the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight authority's power to manage Mauna Kea lands after the end of the transition period pursuant to section 195H-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, or any other law. (b)  Notwithstanding section 195H-6(f), Hawaii Revised Statutes, or any other law to the contrary, and subject to the agreement of the respective astronomical observatory, all subleases of Mauna Kea lands to astronomical observatories shall be extended for a period of ten years, to expire on December 31, 2043; provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to amend, or authorize the amendment of, any other term or provision within a respective sublease except for the date upon which the sublease expires. (c) As used in this section: "Astronomical observatory" means any person or entity that leases any portion of Mauna Kea lands for the purpose of operating a telescope observatory or for other astronomical research purposes. "Mauna Kea lands" has the same meaning as in section 195H‑2, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________